Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 11. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS; PRESERVATION

SUBTITLE A. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS

CHAPTER 3106. STAR OF TEXAS AWARDS

Sec. 3106.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Emergency medical first responder" means an employee or volunteer of the state, a political subdivision, or an emergency medical services provider who provides urgent on-site medical care to the sick or injured.

(2) "Firefighter" includes a volunteer firefighter.

Text of subdivision effective until January 01, 2025

(3) "Peace officer" means a peace officer commissioned by the state or a political subdivision of the state under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law.

Text of subdivision effective on January 01, 2025

(3) "Peace officer" means a peace officer commissioned by the state or a political subdivision of the state under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law.

(4) "Next of kin" means the relative in the nearest degree of relationship to a deceased person, including the person's spouse, child, parent, or sibling.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 3105.001 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(43), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 585 (S.B. 877), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.120, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 3106.002. PEACE OFFICERS' STAR OF TEXAS AWARD. (a) The Peace Officers' Star of Texas Award shall be awarded to:

(1) each peace officer who is seriously injured in the line of duty;

(2) the surviving next of kin of each peace officer who is killed or sustains a fatal injury in the line of duty;

(3) each federal law enforcement officer or special agent who is seriously injured while performing duties in this state to assist a state or local law enforcement agency; and

(4) the surviving next of kin of each federal law enforcement officer or special agent who is killed or sustains a fatal injury while performing duties in this state to assist a state or local law enforcement agency.

(b) The Peace Officers' Star of Texas Award Advisory Committee shall advise the governor on the issuance, design, and presentation of the Peace Officers' Star of Texas Award.

(c) The committee consists of three current or retired peace officers appointed by the governor who have each served with distinction during a lengthy career as a peace officer.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 3105.002 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(43), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 990 (H.B. 1977), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 109 (H.B. 1164), Sec. 1, eff. May 17, 2007.

Sec. 3106.003. FIREFIGHTERS' STAR OF TEXAS AWARD. (a) The Firefighters' Star of Texas Award shall be awarded to each firefighter who is seriously injured in the line of duty and the surviving next of kin of each firefighter who is killed or sustains a fatal injury in the line of duty.

(b) The Firefighters' Star of Texas Award Advisory Committee shall advise the governor on the issuance, design, and presentation of the Firefighters' Star of Texas Award.

(c) The committee consists of three current or retired firefighters appointed by the governor who have each served with distinction during a lengthy career as a firefighter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 3105.003 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(43), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 990 (H.B. 1977), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 3106.004. EMERGENCY MEDICAL FIRST RESPONDERS' STAR OF TEXAS AWARD. (a) The Emergency Medical First Responders' Star of Texas Award shall be awarded to each emergency medical first responder who is seriously injured in the line of duty and the surviving next of kin of each emergency medical first responder who is killed or sustains a fatal injury in the line of duty.

(b) The Emergency Medical First Responders' Star of Texas Award Advisory Committee shall advise the governor on the issuance, design, and presentation of the Emergency Medical First Responders' Star of Texas Award.

(c) The committee consists of three current or retired emergency medical first responders appointed by the governor who have each served with distinction during a lengthy career as an emergency medical first responder.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 3105.004 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(43), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 990 (H.B. 1977), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 3106.0041. CITIZENS' STAR OF TEXAS AWARD. (a) The Citizens' Star of Texas Award shall be awarded to:

(1) a private citizen who is seriously injured while aiding or attempting to aid a peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical first responder in the performance of the duties of the officer, firefighter, or first responder; and

(2) the surviving next of kin of a private citizen who is killed or sustains a fatal injury while aiding or attempting to aid a peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical first responder in the performance of the duties of the officer, firefighter, or first responder.

(b) The Peace Officers' Star of Texas Award Advisory Committee under Section 3106.002, the Firefighters' Star of Texas Award Advisory Committee under Section 3106.003, and the Emergency Medical First Responders' Star of Texas Award Advisory Committee under Section 3106.004, as applicable, shall advise the governor on the issuance, design, and presentation of the Citizens' Star of Texas Award.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 585 (S.B. 877), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 3106.005. GENERAL MATTERS AFFECTING ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (a) Each member of an advisory committee created under this chapter serves at the will of the governor.

(b) The governor shall designate the presiding officer of each advisory committee.

(c) Each advisory committee shall meet once annually at the call of the governor or the presiding officer of the committee not later than three weeks before September 11, and at a location deemed appropriate by the governor or the governor's representative.

(d) A member of an advisory committee may not receive compensation for service on the committee or reimbursement for travel expenses incurred while conducting the business of the committee.

(e) An advisory committee is not subject to Chapter 2110.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 3105.005 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(43), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 3106.006. PRESENTATION; AWARD. (a) The governor or the governor's representative shall present in the name of the state a star of Texas award under this chapter to the appropriate recipient or surviving next of kin during a public ceremony held on, or as near as practicable to, September 11 of each year.

(b) At a minimum, the award shall consist of a medal, a certificate, and a ribbon suitable for wearing on a uniform.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 3105.006 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(43), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 3106.007. RECOMMENDATION FOR AWARD. (a) Any person who has personal knowledge that a peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical first responder has been killed or seriously injured in the line of duty, or that a federal law enforcement officer or special agent has been killed or seriously injured while performing duties in this state to assist a state or local law enforcement agency, may submit that information in writing to a committee under this chapter.

(b) The head of an agency that employs a peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical first responder who has knowledge of a private citizen described by Section 3106.0041(a) and a state legislator representing the district in which the private citizen resides may submit information about the private citizen in writing to a committee under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 614, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Renumbered from Government Code, Section 3105.007 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(43), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 109 (H.B. 1164), Sec. 2, eff. May 17, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 585 (S.B. 877), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.